Hunspell/hy-AM.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY գկքրռեէդթտփբպջչճժշզսԳԿՔՐՌԵէԴԹՏՓԲՊՋՉՃԺՇԶՍ
FLAG num
WORDCHARS '՛՜՞ը–­-
IGNORE ՛՜՞ը–­-

PFX 300 Y 1
PFX 300   0	ան	. [ան]+

PFX 301 Y 1
PFX 301   0	կ՚	. [կ՚]+

PFX 302 Y 1
PFX 302	  0	կ	. [կ]+

PFX 303 Y 1
PFX 303   0	զ	. [զ]+

PFX 304 Y 1
PFX 304   0	հ	. [հ]+

PFX 305 Y 1
PFX 305   0	ց	. [ց]+

PFX 306 Y 1
PFX 306   0	չ	. [չ]+

PFX 307 Y 1
PFX 307   0	չ՚	. [չ՚]+

SFX 4 Y 1
SFX 4 	0	ն	. +ն

SFX 5 Y 1
SFX 5 	0	ը	. +ը

SFX 6 Y 2
SFX 6 	յ	ն	յ	-յ+ն
SFX 6 	0	ն	[^յ] +ն

SFX 7 Y 2
SFX 7 	յ	ներ	յ	-յ+ներ
SFX 7 	0	ներ	[^յ]	+ներ

SFX 8 Y 1
SFX 8 	0	եր	.	+եր

SFX 9 Y 1
SFX 9 	0	ներ	.	+ներ

SFX 10 Y 5
SFX 10 0	ի	[^աոօւ]	+ի
SFX 10 0	յի	[աո]	+յի
SFX 10 օ		ոյի	[օ]		-օ+ոյի
SFX 10 0	ի	[^ո]ւ	+ի
SFX 10 ու	վի	ու		-ու+վի

SFX 11 Y 2
SFX 11	 0	ու	[^ցհ][^ի] +ու
SFX 11	 ի	ու	[ցհ]ի	-ի+ու

SFX 12 Y 5
SFX 12	 0	ե	[^աոօւ]	+ե
SFX 12	 0	յե	[աո]	+յե
SFX 12	 օ	ոյե	[օ]		-օ+ոյե
SFX 12	 0	ե	[^ո]ւ	+ե
SFX 12	 ու	վե	ու		-ու+վե

SFX 13 Y 1
SFX 13	 0	մե	.	+մե

SFX 14 Y 5
SFX 14	 0	ով	[^աոօւ]	+ով
SFX 14	 0	յով	[աո]	+յով
SFX 14	 օ	ոյով	[օ]		-օ+ոյով
SFX 14	 0	ով	[^ո]ւ	+ով
SFX 14	 ու	վով	ու		-ու+վով

SFX 15 Y 1
SFX 15	 0	մով	.	+մով

SFX 16 Y 2
SFX 16	 0	ո	.	+ո
SFX 16	 ա	ո	իա	-ա+ո

SFX 17 Y 5
SFX 17	 0	ում	[^աոօւ]	+ում
SFX 17	 0	յում	[աո]	+յում	
SFX 17	 օ	ոյում	[օ]	-օ+ոյում
SFX 17	 0	ում	[^ո]ւ	+ում
SFX 17	 ու	վում	ու		-ու+վում

SFX 18 Y 1
SFX 18	 ում	ման	ում	-ում+ման

SFX 19 Y 1
SFX 19	 ում	մանե	ում	-ում+մանե

SFX 20 Y 1
SFX 20	 ում	մամբ	ում	-ում+մամբ

SFX 21 Y 1
SFX 21	 յուն	յան	յուն	-յուն+յան

SFX 22 Y 1
SFX 22	 յուն	ենե	յուն	-յուն+ենե

SFX 23 Y 1
SFX 23	 յուն	յամբ	յուն	-յուն+յամբ

SFX 24 Y 1
SFX 24	 յուն	յանց	յուն	-յուն+յանց

SFX 25 Y 1
SFX 25	 0	ա	.	+ա

SFX 26 Y 1
SFX 26	 0	ան	.	+ան

SFX 27 Y 1
SFX 27	 0	անի	.	+անի

SFX 28 Y 1
SFX 28	 0	անով	.	+անով

SFX 29 Y 1
SFX 29	 0	անե	.	+անե

SFX 30 Y 1
SFX 30	 0	վա	.	+վա

SFX 31 Y 1
SFX 31	 0	վան	.	+վան

SFX 32 Y 1
SFX 32	 0	վնե	.	+վնե

SFX 33 Y 1
SFX 33	 0	վամբ	.	+վամբ

SFX 34 Y 1
SFX 34	 0	վանից	.	+վանից

SFX 35 Y 1
SFX 35	 0	յաց	.	+յաց

SFX 36 Y 1
SFX 36	 0	վոց	.	+վոց

SFX 37 Y 1
SFX 37	 0	ք	.	+ք

SFX 38 Y 2
SFX 38	 յ	ք	յ	-յ+ք
SFX 38	 0	ք	[^յ]	+ք

SFX 39 Y 1
SFX 39	 0	ց	.	+ց

SFX 40 Y 2
SFX 40	 յ	ց	յ	-յ+ց
SFX 40	 0	ց	[^յ]	+ց

SFX 41 Y 1
SFX 41	 0	ս	.	+ս

SFX 42 Y 2
SFX 42	 յ	ս	յ	-յ+ս
SFX 42	 0	ս	[^յ]	+ս

SFX 43 Y 1
SFX 43	 0	դ	.	+դ

SFX 44 Y 2
SFX 44	 յ	դ	յ	-յ+դ
SFX 44	 0	դ	[^յ]	+դ

SFX 45 Y 3
SFX 45	 ո	ով	ո	-ո+ով
SFX 45	 ի	ով	ի	-ի+ով
SFX 45	 ու	վով	ու	-ու+վով

SFX 46 Y 1
SFX 46	 ո	մով	ո	-ո+մով

SFX 47 Y 3
SFX 47	 ո	ե	ո	-ո+ե
SFX 47	 ի	ե	ի	-ի+ե
SFX 47	 ու	վե	ու	-ու+վե

SFX 48 Y 1
SFX 48	 ո	մե	ո	-ո+մե

SFX 49 Y 5
SFX 49	 ո	ում	ո			-ո+ում
SFX 49	 ուի	վում	ուի			-ուի+վում	
SFX 49	 ի	ում	[^ո]ւի		-ի+ում
SFX 49	 ի	ում	[^ո][^ւ]ի	-ի+ում
SFX 49	 ու	վում	ու			-ու+վում

SFX 50 Y 1
SFX 50	 ա	ան	ա	-ա+ան

SFX 51 Y 1
SFX 51	 ա	ընե	ա	-ա+ընե

SFX 52 Y 1
SFX 52	 ա	անե	ա	-ա+անե

SFX 53 Y 1
SFX 53	 ա	ամբ	ա	-ա+ամբ

SFX 54 Y 1
SFX 54	 ա	անից	ա	-ա+անից

SFX 55 Y 4
SFX 55	 ուլ	լու	ուլ	-ուլ+լու
SFX 55	 իլ	ելու	իլ	-իլ+ելու
SFX 55	 0	ու	ել	+ու
SFX 55	 0	ու	ալ	+ու

SFX 56 Y 4
SFX 56	 ուլ	լե	ուլ	-ուլ+լե
SFX 56	 իլ	ելե	իլ	-իլ+ելե
SFX 56	 0	ե	ել	+ե
SFX 56	 0	ե	ալ	+ե

SFX 57 Y 4
SFX 57	 ուլ	լով	ուլ	-ուլ+լով
SFX 57	 իլ	ելով	իլ	-իլ+ելով
SFX 57	 0	ով	ել	+ով
SFX 57	 0	ով	ալ	+ով

SFX 58 Y 5
SFX 58	 յք	նց	յք	-յք+նց
SFX 58	 աք	ոց	աք	-աք+ոց
SFX 58	 իք	յաց	իք	-իք+յաց
SFX 58	 նք	նց	նք	-նք+նց
SFX 58	 րք	րց	րք	-րք+րց	

SFX 70 Y 4
SFX 70	 ուլ	լիս	ուլ	-ուլ+լիս
SFX 70	 իլ	ելիս	իլ	-իլ+ելիս
SFX 70	 0	իս	ել	+իս
SFX 70	 0	իս	ալ	+իս

SFX 71 Y 4
SFX 71	 ուլ	լից	ուլ	-ուլ+լից
SFX 71	 իլ	ելից	իլ	-իլ+ելից	
SFX 71	 0	ից	ել	+ից
SFX 71	 0	ից	ալ	+ից

SFX 72 Y 4
SFX 72	 ուլ	լում	ուլ		-ուլ+լում
SFX 72	 իլ	ելում	իլ	-իլ+ելում
SFX 72	 0	ում	ել		+ում
SFX 72	 0	ում	ալ		+ում

SFX 73 Y 4
SFX 73	 ուլ	լիք	ուլ	-ուլ+լիք
SFX 73	 իլ	ելիք	իլ	-իլ+ելիք
SFX 73	 0	իք	ել	+իք
SFX 73	 0	իք	ալ	+իք

SFX 74 Y 1
SFX 74	 0	անից	.	+անից

SFX 75 Y 1
SFX 75	 0	անով	.	+անով

SFX 76 Y 1
SFX 76	 0	անում	.	+անում

SFX 77 Y 1
SFX 77	 0	նից	.	+նից

SFX 78 Y 1
SFX 78	 0	նով	.	+նով

SFX 79 Y 1
SFX 79	 0	նում	.	+նում

SFX 80 Y 1
SFX 80	 0	աց	.	+աց
	
SFX 81 Y 1
SFX 81	 0	ուց	.	+ուց

SFX 82 Y 1
SFX 82	 0	ից	.	+ից

SFX 83 Y 1
SFX 83	 0	նը	.	+նը

SFX 60 Y 1
SFX 60	 0	նս	.	+նս

SFX 61 Y 1
SFX 61	 0	նդ	.	+նդ

SFX 62 Y 1
SFX 62	 0	նն	.	+նն

SFX 65 Y 1
SFX 65	 0	ինս	.	+ինս

SFX 66 Y 1
SFX 66	 0	ինդ	.	+ինդ

SFX 84 Y 1
SFX 84	 0	ինը	.	+ինը

SFX 85 Y 1
SFX 85	 0	ունը	.	+ունը

SFX 86 Y 1
SFX 86	 0	ուս	.	+ուս

SFX 87 Y 1
SFX 87	 0	ուդ	.	+ուդ

SFX 88 Y 1
SFX 88	 0	ուն	.	+ուն

SFX 89 Y 1
SFX 89	 0	իս	.	+իս

SFX 90 Y 1
SFX 90	 0	իդ	.	+իդ

SFX 91 Y 1
SFX 91	 0	ին	.	+ին

SFX 92 Y 1
SFX 92	 0	իցս	.	+իցս

SFX 93 Y 1
SFX 93	 0	իցդ	.	+իցդ

SFX 94 Y 1
SFX 94	 0	իցն	.	+իցն

SFX 95 Y 1
SFX 95	 0	իցը	.	+իցը

SFX 96 Y 1
SFX 96	 0	ես	.	+ես

SFX 97 Y 1
SFX 97	 0	եդ	.	+եդ

SFX 98 Y 1
SFX 98	 0	են	.	+են

SFX 99 Y 1
SFX 99   0	ովս	.	+ովս

SFX 100 Y 1
SFX 100   0	ովդ	.	+ովդ

SFX 101 Y 1
SFX 101   0	ովն	.	+ովն

SFX 102 Y 1
SFX 102   0	ովը	.	+ովը

SFX 103 Y 1
SFX 103   0	ումս	.	+ումս

SFX 104 Y 1
SFX 104   0	ումդ	.	+ումդ

SFX 105 Y 1
SFX 105   0	ումն	.	+ումն

SFX 106 Y 1
SFX 106   0	ումը	.	+ումը

SFX 107 Y 2
SFX 107   յ	ներ/4,5,10,11,12,14,17,41,43,81,82,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	յ		-յ+ներ
SFX 107   0	ներ/4,5,10,11,12,14,17,41,43,81,82,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	[^յ]		+ներ

SFX 108 Y 1
SFX 108   0	եր/4,5,10,11,12,14,17,41,43,81,82,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	.	+եր

SFX 109 Y 1
SFX 109   0	ներ/4,5,10,11,12,14,17,41,43,81,82,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	.	+ներ

SFX 118 Y 1
SFX 118	  ում	ման/4,5,41,43	ում	-ում+ման

SFX 119 Y 1
SFX 119	  ում	մանե/4,41,43	ում	-ում+մանե

SFX 120 Y 1
SFX 120	  ում	մամբ/4,5,41,43	ում	-ում+մամբ

SFX 219 Y 1
SFX 219	  ում	մանից/4,5,41,43	ում	-ում+մանից

SFX 121 Y 1
SFX 121	  յուն	յան/4,5,39,41,43	յուն	-յուն+յան

SFX 122 Y 1
SFX 122	  յուն	ենե/4,41,43	յուն	-յուն+ենե

SFX 123 Y 1
SFX 123	  յուն	յամբ/4,5,41,43	յուն	-յուն+յամբ

SFX 222 Y 1
SFX 222	  յուն	յանից/4,5,41,43	յուն	-յուն+յանից

SFX 125 Y 1
SFX 125	  0	ա/41,43	.	+ա

SFX 126 Y 1
SFX 126	  0	ան/4,5,41,43	.	+ան

SFX 127 Y 1
SFX 127	  0	անի/4,41,43	.	+անի

SFX 129 Y 1
SFX 129	  0	անե/4,41,43	.	+անե

SFX 128 Y 1
SFX 128	  0	անով/4,5,41,43	.	+անով

SFX 229 Y 1
SFX 229	  0	անից/4,5,41,43	.	+անից

SFX 356 Y 2
SFX 356   0	ն/4,5,40,41,43	[^յ]	+ն
SFX 356   յ	ն/4,5,40,41,43	[յ]	-յ+ն

SFX 130 Y 1
SFX 130	  0	վա/41,43	 .	+վա

SFX 131 Y 1
SFX 131	  0	վան/4,5,41,43	 .	+վան

SFX 132 Y 1
SFX 132	  0	վնե/4,41,43	 .	+վնե

SFX 133 Y 1
SFX 133	  0	վամբ/4,5,41,43	 .	+վամբ

SFX 134 Y 1
SFX 134	  0	վանից/4,5,41,43 .	+վանից

SFX 210 Y 5
SFX 210	  0	ից/4,5,41,43	[^աոօւ]		+ից
SFX 210	  0	յից/4,5,41,43	[աո]	+յից
SFX 210	  օ	ոյից/4,5,41,43	[օ]		-օ+ոյից
SFX 210	  0	ից/4,5,41,43	[^ո]ւ		+ից
SFX 210	  ու	վից/4,5,41,43	ու		-ու+վից

SFX 211 Y 2
SFX 211	  0	ուց/4,5,41,43	[^ց][^ի]	+ուց
SFX 211	  ի	ուց/4,5,41,43	ցի		-ի+ուց

SFX 110 Y 5
SFX 110	  0	ի/4,39,41,43,83,60,61,62	[^աոօւ]	+ի
SFX 110	  0	յի/4,39,41,43,83,60,61,62	[աո]	+յի
SFX 110	  օ	ոյի/4,39,41,43,83,60,61,62	[օ]		-օ+ոյի
SFX 110	  0	ի/4,39,41,43,83,60,61,62	[^ո]ւ	+ի
SFX 110	  ու	վի/4,39,41,43,83,60,61,62	ու		-ու+վի

SFX 111 Y 2
SFX 111	  0	ու/4,39,41,43,83	[^ցհ][^ի]	+ու
SFX 111	  ի	ու/4,39,41,43,83	[ցհ]ի		-ի+ու

SFX 112 Y 5
SFX 112	  0	ե/4,41,43	[^աոօւ]	+ե
SFX 112	  0	յե/4,41,43	[աո]	+յե
SFX 112	  օ	ոյե/4,41,43	[օ]		-օ+ոյե
SFX 112	  0	ե/4,41,43	[^ո]ւ	+ե
SFX 112	  ու	վե/4,41,43	ու		-ու+վե

SFX 113 Y 1
SFX 113	  0	մե/4,41,43	.	+մե

SFX 114 Y 5
SFX 114	  0	ով/4,5,41,43	[^աոօւ]	+ով
SFX 114	  0	յով/4,5,41,43	[աո]	+յով
SFX 114	  օ	ոյով/4,5,41,43	[օ]		-օ+ոյով
SFX 114	  0	ով/4,5,41,43	[^ո]ւ	+ով
SFX 114	  ու	վով/4,5,41,43	ու		-ու+վով

SFX 115 Y 1
SFX 115	  0	մով/4,5,41,43	.	+մով

SFX 117 Y 5
SFX 117	  0	ում/4,5,41,43	[^աոօւ]	+ում
SFX 117	  0	յում/4,5,41,43	[աո]	+յում
SFX 117	  օ	ոյում/4,5,41,43	[օ]		-օ+ոյում
SFX 117	  0	ում/4,5,41,43	[^ո]ւ	+ում
SFX 117	  ու	վում/4,5,41,43	ու		-ու+վում

SFX 140 Y 2
SFX 140	 յ	ց/4,5,41,43,14,17,82	յ		-յ+ց
SFX 140	 0	ց/4,5,41,43,14,17,82	[^յ]		+ց

SFX 206 Y 2
SFX 206   յ	ն/4,5,41,43	յ		-յ+ն
SFX 206   0	ն/4,5,41,43	[^յ]		+ն

SFX 207 Y 5
SFX 207   0	իններ/4,5,10,11,12,14,17,41,43,81,82,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	[^աօու]	+իններ
SFX 207   0	յիններ/4,5,10,11,12,14,17,41,43,81,82,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	[աո]	+յիններ
SFX 207	  օ	ոյիններ/4,5,10,11,12,14,17,41,43,81,82,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	[օ]		-օ+ոյիններ
SFX 207   0	իններ/4,5,10,11,12,14,17,41,43,81,82,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	[^ո]ւ	+իններ
SFX 207   ու	վիններ/4,5,10,11,12,14,17,41,43,81,82,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	ու		-ու+վիններ

SFX 145 Y 3
SFX 145	  ո	ով/4,5,41,43	ո	-ո+ով
SFX 145	  ի	ով/4,5,41,43	ի	-ի+ով
SFX 145	  ու	վով/4,5,41,43	ու	-ու+վով

SFX 146 Y 1
SFX 146	  ո	մով/4,5,41,43	ո	-ո+մով

SFX 147 Y 3
SFX 147	  ո	ե/4,41,43	ո	-ո+ե
SFX 147	  ի	ե/4,41,43	ի	-ի+ե
SFX 147	  ու	վե/4,41,43	ու	-ու+վե

SFX 148 Y 1
SFX 148	  ո	մե/4,41,43	ո	-ո+մե

SFX 149 Y 5
SFX 149	  ո	ում/4,5,41,43	ո			-ո+ում
SFX 149	  ուի	վում/4,5,41,43	ուի		-ուի+վում
SFX 149	  ի	ում/4,5,41,43	[^ո]ւի		-ի+ում
SFX 149	  ի	ում/4,5,41,43	[^ո][^ւ]ի	-ի+ում
SFX 149	  ու	վում/4,5,41,43	ու			-ու+վում

SFX 150 Y 1
SFX 150	  ա	ան/4,5,41,43	ա	-ա+ան

SFX 151 Y 1
SFX 151	  ա	ընե/4,41,43	ա	-ա+ընե

SFX 152 Y 1
SFX 152	  ա	անե/4,41,43	ա	-ա+անե

SFX 153 Y 1
SFX 153	  ա	ամբ/4,5,41,43	ա	-ա+ամբ

SFX 154 Y 1
SFX 154	  ա	անից/4,5,41,43	ա	-ա+անից

SFX 155 Y 4
SFX 155	 ուլ	լու/4,39,41,43,83	ուլ	-ուլ+լու
SFX 155	 իլ	ելու/4,39,41,43,83	իլ	-իլ+ելու
SFX 155	 0	ու/4,39,41,43,83	ել		+ու
SFX 155	 0	ու/4,39,41,43,83	ալ		+ու

SFX 156 Y 4
SFX 156	 ուլ	լե/4,41,43	ուլ		-ուլ+լե
SFX 156	 իլ	ելե/4,5,41,43	իլ	-իլ+ելե
SFX 156	 0	ե/4,5,41,43	ել		+ե
SFX 156	 0	ե/4,5,41,43	ալ		+ե

SFX 157 Y 4
SFX 157	 ուլ	լով/4,5,41,43	ուլ	-ուլ+լով
SFX 157	 իլ	ելով/4,5,41,43	իլ	-իլ+ելով
SFX 157	 0	ով/4,5,41,43	ել	+ով
SFX 157	 0	ով/4,5,41,43	ալ	+ով

SFX 170 Y 4
SFX 170	 ուլ	լիս/4,5		ուլ	-ուլ+լիս
SFX 170	 իլ	ելիս/4,5	իլ		-իլ+ելիս
SFX 170	 0	իս/4,5		ել	+իս
SFX 170	 0	իս/4,5		ալ	+իս

SFX 171 Y 4
SFX 171	 ուլ	լից/4,5,41,43	ուլ	-ուլ+լից
SFX 171	 իլ	ելից/4,5,41,43	իլ	-իլ+ելից
SFX 171	 0	ից/4,5,41,43	ել		+ից
SFX 171	 0	ից/4,5,41,43	ալ		+ից

SFX 172 Y 4
SFX 172	 ուլ	լում/4,5,41,43	ուլ	-ուլ+լում
SFX 172	 իլ	ելում/4,5,41,43	իլ	-իլ+ելում
SFX 172	 0	ում/4,5,41,43	ել	+ում
SFX 172	 0	ում/4,5,41,43	ալ	+ում

SFX 173 Y 4
SFX 173	 ուլ	լիք/4,5,10,12,14,17,41,43,82,84,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	ուլ		-ուլ+լիք
SFX 173	 իլ	ելիք/4,5,10,12,14,17,41,43,82,84,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	իլ	-իլ+ելիք
SFX 173	 0	իք/4,5,10,12,14,17,41,43,82,84,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	ել		+իք
SFX 173	 0	իք/4,5,10,12,14,17,41,43,82,84,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	ալ		+իք

SFX 273 Y 4
SFX 273	 ուլ	լիքներ/4,5,10,11,12,14,17,41,43,81,82,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	ուլ	-ուլ+լիքներ
SFX 273	 իլ	ելիքներ/4,5,10,11,12,14,17,41,43,81,82,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	իլ	-իլ+ելիքներ
SFX 273	 0	իքներ/4,5,10,11,12,14,17,41,43,81,82,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	ել		+իքներ
SFX 273	 0	իքներ/4,5,10,11,12,14,17,41,43,81,82,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	ալ		+իքներ

SFX 174 Y 1
SFX 174	  0	անից/4,5	.	+անից

SFX 175 Y 1
SFX 175	  0	անով/4,5	.	+անով

SFX 176 Y 1
SFX 176	 0	անում/4,5	.	+անում

SFX 177 Y 1
SFX 177	 0	նից/4,5		.	+նից

SFX 178 Y 1
SFX 178	 0	նով/4,5		.	+նով

SFX 179 Y 1
SFX 179	 0	նում/4,5	.	+նում

SFX 401 Y 1
SFX 401	  լ	մ	լ	-լ+մ

SFX 402 Y 2
SFX 402	  լ	ս	լ	-լ+ս
SFX 402	  մ	ս	մ	-մ+ս
